Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 15 Eminent Domain
18-15-1403. Application.

(a)

When it shall be deemed necessary by the city or town, cemetery or burial association, or persons owning land used for public burial purposes to take private property for burial purposes, an application in writing shall be made to the circuit court of the proper county or the judge thereof in vacation, describing as correctly as may be, the property to be taken and the name of the owner of the land proposed to be condemned and taken.

(b)(1)

Notice of the time and place of the application shall be given, either personally in the ordinary manner of serving process on the owner of the property or by publishing a copy of the application with a statement of the time and place at which it is to be made for three (3) weeks next preceding the time of application in some newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(2)

The personal service as provided for in this section shall be made at least ten (10) days before the time of application when the owner is a resident of the county where the property is situated.

(3)

The publishing of the notice of application in some newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is situated shall be legal notice to the owner of the property when the owner is not a resident of the county where the property is situated.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 9967; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-803.

Cross References.

Application to Department of Health necessary, §20-17-901 et seq.

18-15-1404. Setting of time for inquiry.

If it shall appear to the court or judge that notice has been served ten (10) days before the time of application, or has been published, and that the notice is reasonably specific and certain, then the court or judge shall set a time for the inquiry into the assessment of compensation by a jury before the court or judge.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 9968; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-804.

18-15-1405. Summoning of jury for inquiry.

(a)

A jury shall be summoned for the purpose of making the inquiry in the same manner that petit jurors are summoned in the circuit court for other purposes when the circuit court is regularly in session. If the hearing is before the judge out of term time, then the jury shall be summoned on order of the judge by the sheriff of the county.

(b)

The inquiry and assessment shall be made at the time appointed unless for good cause it is continued to another day to be specified.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 9969; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-805.

18-15-1406. Determination of compensation — Dispute.

(a)

The jury shall hear the evidence and determine the amount of compensation to be paid to the owners of the property so condemned.

(b)(1)

In case of dispute as to the ownership, title, or interest of the property condemned, the amount of compensation determined by the jury may be paid into the court by the city or town, cemetery or burial association, or persons owning land used for public burial purposes.

(2)

The right to the funds so paid in may be determined between the parties making claim thereto and the city or town, cemetery or burial association, or persons owning land used for public burial purposes may proceed to actually take the property after the payment into court as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 9970; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-806.

18-15-1407. Costs.

The cost of the condemnation proceedings provided for in this subchapter shall be paid by the city or town, cemetery or burial association, or persons owning land used for public burial purposes instituting the condemnation proceeding, except costs of review or appeal or any other proceeding taken by the owner of the property after the assessment of compensation is made by the jury as provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 163, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 9971; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-807.

18-15-1408. Public property.

(a)

If a cemetery located on land of a private landowner has been open to public use for a period of at least fifty (50) years, then the cemetery shall be deemed to be public property unless:

(1)

The property has been enclosed by the landowner for at least one (1) year prior to an order of the quorum court providing for the care and management of the cemetery as provided for under subsection (b) of this section; or

(2)

The cemetery has been operated by the landowner for at least one (1) year prior to an order of the quorum court providing for the care and management of the cemetery as provided for under subsection (b) of this section.

(b)(1)

If, upon the petition of any person, the quorum court determines that a cemetery is public property under this section, the quorum court may issue an order providing for the management and care of the cemetery. The county may manage and care for the cemetery or may enter into an agreement allowing a nonprofit association or corporation to provide for the management and care of the cemetery.

(2)

Upon issuing an order for the management and care of the public property, the quorum court shall notify the landowner of its order, based on the quorum court's finding that the property has become public property, and shall include a copy of the provisions of this section. The notice shall be by certified mail.

(3)

No person or his or her heirs shall have, sue, or maintain any action or suit, either in law or equity, for any cemetery lands more than six (6) months after the person receives the notice required under this section.

(c)

The rights of the public to cemetery property under this section shall be in the nature of an adverse possession. No additional conditions for adverse possession shall be imposed in addition to those provided by this section.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 716, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§18-15-1401 —18-15-1407 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 15

— Housing and Urban Renewal

Cross References.

Participation in federal programs, §14-169-901 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 177, § 5: approved Mar. 21, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined and declared that the existence of unsanitary and unsafe dwelling accommodations in the State cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and that it is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety that this act become effective without delay. This act, therefore, will take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1937, No. 298, § 31: approved Mar. 23, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined and declared that unemployment and the existence of unsafe, insanitary and congested dwelling accommodations have produced an alarming economic condition in the State and constitute an emergency and that it is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety that this act become effective without delay. This act, therefore, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 542, § 3: Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, urban renewal agencies in order to receive federal assistance must be able to acquire real property to carry out plan objectives and, whereas, the power of eminent domain of urban renewal agencies needs to be clarified and affirmed in order that urban renewal plan objectives not be jeopardized, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate protection of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-15-1501. Federal housing projects — Legislative declarations.

(a)

It is declared that:

(1)

Unsanitary and unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in various areas of the state and that consequently many persons of low income are forced to reside in such dwelling accommodations;

(2)

These conditions cause an increase in, and spread of, disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the citizens of the state and impair economic values;

(3)

The clearance, replanning, and reconstruction of the areas in which unsanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which private property may be acquired; and

(4)

It is in the public interest that work on the projects be instituted as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency.

(b)

The necessity in the public interest for the provisions of this subchapter is declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 177, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 5083; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1301.

18-15-1502. Federal housing projects — Definition.

(a)

The term “housing project” whenever used in this section, §18-15-1501, and §18-15-1503 shall mean any undertaking:

(1)

To demolish, clear, remove, alter, or repair unsafe or unsanitary housing; or

(2)

To provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income.

(b)

The term may also include such buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies for educational, health, or welfare purposes and such necessary utilities as are designed primarily for the benefit and use of the occupants of the dwelling accommodations.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 177, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 5084; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1302.

18-15-1503. Federal housing projects — Right of eminent domain.

(a)(1)

Any corporation which is an agency of the United States of America shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including improvements and fixtures thereon, which it may deem necessary for a housing project being constructed, operated, or aided by it or the United States of America.

(2)

Any corporation borrowing money or receiving other financial assistance from the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the construction or operation of any housing project, the operation of which will be subject to public supervision or regulation, shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements thereon, which it may deem necessary for the project.

(3)

A housing project shall be deemed to be subject to public supervision or regulation within the meaning of this section, §18-15-1501, and §18-15-1502 if the rents to be charged are in any way subject to the supervision, regulation, or approval of the United States of America, the state or any of their subdivisions or agencies, or by a housing authority, city, municipality, or county, whether the right to supervise, regulate, or approve is by virtue of any law, statute, contract, or otherwise.

(b)

Any corporate agency of the United States of America or any such corporation, upon the adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use, may exercise the power of eminent domain:

(1)

In the manner now provided for taking private property for rights-of-way for railroads as provided by §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207;

(2)

In the manner provided for condemnation by municipal corporations and counties as provided by §§18-15-301 —18-15-307; or

(3)

Pursuant to any other applicable statutory provision enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 177, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 5085; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1303.

18-15-1504. Housing authorities — Power of eminent domain.

(a)

A housing authority shall have the right to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property which it may deem necessary for its purposes under this subchapter after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described in it is necessary for those purposes.

(b)

An authority may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner prescribed in §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207 for condemnation by railroad corporations in this state, or it may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

(c)(1)

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in like manner.

(2)

However, no real property belonging to the city, the county, the state, or any political subdivision thereof may be acquired without its consent.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 298, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 10070; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3015.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1937, No. 298, § 12, is also codified as §14-169-219.

18-15-1505. Urban renewal agencies.

(a)(1)(A)

From and after the passage of this act, any urban renewal agency in this state created pursuant to the provisions of §§14-169-601 —14-169-609,14-169-701 —14-169-713, and14-169-801 shall have the power of eminent domain to carry out urban renewal plan objectives.

(B)

The procedure to be followed by the urban renewal agency to acquire property by eminent domain shall be that the board of commissioners shall, by resolution, declare that:

(i)

The acquisition of certain real property is necessary for urban renewal plan objectives which have been approved by the governing body of the municipal government after a public hearing;

(ii)

Negotiations for acquisition have been unsuccessful; and

(iii)

Suit is authorized to condemn the property.

(2)(A)

An urban renewal agency may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner prescribed by law for condemnation by railroad corporations in this state as prescribed by §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207 and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(B)

The urban renewal agency may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

(b)

It is the intent of this section to affirm the power of urban renewal agencies to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire real property to carry out urban renewal plan objectives.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 542, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-3075, 19-3076.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1971, No. 542, §§ 1 and 2, are also codified as §14-169-802.

In reference to the term “passage of this act,” Acts 1971, No. 542, was signed by the Governor and became effective on April 6, 1971.

Subchapter 16

— Traction Companies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1901, No. 90, § 6: effective on passage.

18-15-1601. Authority to condemn.

(a)(1)

Every traction company shall have the right to survey its lines, lay out its road, acquire its right-of-way not exceeding two hundred feet (200') in width, and, where necessary to acquire the right-of-way, shall have the power to enter upon, condemn, and appropriate the lands, rights-of-way, easements, and property of persons, firms, or corporations.

(2)

The method and manner of making the traction company's surveys, laying out its railways, or acquiring its right-of-way, either by contract or condemnation, shall be the same as provided by law in case of the exercise of the right of eminent domain by telegraph, telephone, and railroad companies, under §§18-15-1201 —18-15-1207, and it shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities and have the same rights as prescribed in those sections with reference to railroads.

(b)

However, this section shall not be construed so as to authorize the condemnation of public streets or highways.

History.

Acts 1901, No. 90, § 3, p. 155; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1759, 4042; Pope's Dig., § 5044; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-208.

Publisher's Notes.

Pursuant to the remainder of Acts 1901, No. 90, which was superseded by §4-26-101 et seq., “traction companies” were corporations formed for the purpose of operating interurban electric roads and furnishing light and power to consumers.

Subchapter 17

— Private Property Protection Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

From time to time, state and local regulatory programs have the effect of reducing the market value of private property;

“(2)

When state and local regulatory programs reduce the market value of private property and do not abate through their implementation a public nuisance affecting the public health, safety, morals, or general welfare, it is fair and appropriate that the state or the locality compensate the property owner for the loss in market value of the property caused by the implementation of the regulatory program;

“(3)

Compensation to the property owner is also fair and appropriate in cases involving regulatory programs that abate a public nuisance when the property owner did not contribute to the public nuisance, did not acquire the property knowing of the public nuisance, or did not acquire the property under circumstances in which the property owner should have known about the public nuisance based upon prevailing community standards; and

“(4)

In order to establish a fair and equitable compensation system to address these stated public policy concerns and findings, the General Assembly should establish a compensation system.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, § 4: Apr. 2, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some actions by a governmental unit reduce the value of real property; that the property owners now are not being compensated for that reduction in value; and that this act is immediately necessary because the inequity needs to be eliminated as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

18-15-1701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Private Property Protection Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2.

18-15-1702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Fair market value” means the price a willing buyer would pay a willing seller after considering all factors in the marketplace that influence the price of private real property;

(2)

“Governmental unit” means the state and any of its agencies or political subdivisions;

(3)

“Owner” means a person with legal or equitable title to affected private real property at the time a taking occurs;

(4)

“Real property” means real property, the use of which is directly controlled or regulated by a regulatory program;

(5)(A)

“Regulatory program” means a rule, regulation, law, or ordinance that affects the fair market value of real property.

(B)

“Regulatory program” includes without limitation moratoriums on growth, aesthetic or scenic districts, environmental districts, overlay districts, green space ordinances, landscape ordinances, tree ordinances, land use planning programs, and zoning programs by a governmental unit when the regulatory program is not designed to carry out or protect the adopted plans of a governmental unit that are designed to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens.

(C)

“Regulatory program” does not include a moratorium enacted to give a municipality time to adopt or amend plans and ordinances; and

(6)

“Territorial jurisdiction” means the territorial jurisdiction of a municipality as described in §14-56-413.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2.

18-15-1703. Taking — Application.

(a)(1)

An owner of real property asserting a taking under this subchapter shall bring a cause of action in circuit court claiming that the implementation of a regulatory program by a governmental unit has permanently reduced by at least twenty percent (20%) the fair market value of the real property.

(2)

The reduction in the fair market value of the real property shall be determined by comparing the fair market value of the real property as if the regulatory program is not in effect and the fair market value of the real property determined as if the regulatory program is in effect.

(3)

To assert that a taking has occurred, the regulatory program must have been implemented at the time the owner acquired title or after April 2, 2015, whichever is later.

(4)

Upon a preponderance of the evidence, the real property shall be deemed to have been taken for the use of the public.

(b)

A jury shall determine the amount of the difference in fair market value.

(c)(1)

Upon a finding that real property has been taken for the use of the public, the governmental unit may either:

(A)

Pay compensation for the reduction in fair market value caused by the regulatory program; or

(B)

Invalidate all or part of the regulatory program.

(2)

Compensation is required under this section only when the fair market value of the real property is reduced by at least twenty percent (20%).

(3)

If a governmental unit elects to pay compensation to the private real property owner under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section:

(A)

The court that rendered the judgment in the lawsuit or the state agency that issued the final order or decision in the case shall withdraw the part of the judgment or final decision or order rescinding the regulatory program;

(B)

The governmental unit shall pay to the owner the damages determined in the judgment or final order by the thirtieth day after the date the judgment is rendered or the final decision or order is issued; and

(C)

When more than one (1) governmental unit is involved, the court shall determine the proportion each governmental unit shall be required to contribute to the compensation.

(d)

When a regulatory program resulting from a zoning ordinance operates to change a permitted use and the fair market value of the affected real property is the same or greater than the fair market value was before the effective date of the implementation of the regulatory program, compensation shall not be paid under this subchapter.

(e)

This subchapter does not apply to:

(1)

An owner of real property if the real property is not the direct subject of the regulatory program;

(2)

Laws or rules within the jurisdiction of the State Health Officer or regulatory activities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Division of Environmental Quality, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, the Arkansas Public Service Commission, or the State Plant Board under delegated or authorized programs or approved plans under federal law;

(3)

An eminent domain proceeding to which the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, 42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2015, applies;

(4)

An eminent domain proceeding undertaken by a governmental unit under applicable law;

(5)

A lawful forfeiture or seizure of contraband under Arkansas Code, Title 5;

(6)

A lawful seizure of property as evidence of a crime or violation of law;

(7)

An action, including an action of a governmental unit, that is reasonably taken to fulfill an obligation mandated by federal law or an action of a governmental unit that is reasonably taken to fulfill an obligation mandated by state law;

(8)

The discontinuance or modification of a program, rule, or regulation that provides a unilateral expectation that does not rise to the level of a recognized interest in private real property;

(9)

An action taken to prohibit or restrict a condition or use of private real property if the governmental entity reasonably determines that the condition or use constitutes a public or private nuisance as determined by background principles of nuisance and property law of this state;

(10)

An action taken out of a reasonable good faith belief that the action is necessary to prevent an immediate threat to life or property;

(11)

A rule, regulation, or proclamation adopted for the purpose of regulating water safety, hunting, fishing, or control of nonindigenous or exotic aquatic resources;

(12)

An action taken by a governmental unit:

(A)

To regulate construction in an area designated under law as a floodplain;

(B)

To regulate on-site sewage facilities;

(C)

To prevent waste of or protect rights of owners of interest in groundwater;

(D)

To prevent subsidence; or

(E)

Under its police power to make laws, rules, and regulations for the benefit of its communities;

(13)

The appraisal of property for purposes of ad valorem taxation;

(14)

An action that is taken in response to a threat to public health and safety that is designed to advance the health and safety purpose; or

(15)

An action by a municipality unless the regulatory program has effect in the territorial jurisdiction of the municipality, excluding annexation, and that enacts or enforces a regulatory program that does not impose identical requirements or restrictions in the entire territorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 1686, 1687; 2019, No. 910, § 3186.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rule” in (e)(8) and “rules” in (e)(12)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (e)(2).

18-15-1704. Statute of limitations.

(a)(1)

A lawsuit under this subchapter shall be filed by the one-hundred-eightieth day after the date the private real property owner knew or should have known that the regulatory program restricted or limited the owner's right in the private real property.

(2)

The statute of limitations begins upon the final administrative decision implementing the regulatory program affecting the owner's or user's property.

(b)

A program is implemented with respect to an owner's or user's property when actually applied to that property.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2.

18-15-1705. Cumulative remedies.

(a)

The remedies provided under this subchapter are not exclusive and are in addition to other procedures or remedies provided by law.

(b)

A person shall not recover under this subchapter and also recover under another law or in an action at common law for the same economic loss.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2.

18-15-1706. Appeals.

An appeal from the final judgment of the cause of action in §18-15-1703 may be taken according to law.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1002, §
2.